Massachusetts, session 194th, S1193.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 85K of chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official 
edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the 
following sentence:- 
"It shall not constitute a defense to any cause of action based on tort brought against a 
corporation, trustees of a trust, or members of an association that said corporation, trust, or 
association is, or at the time the cause of action arose was, a charity.".